Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,150
Federal grants; director; powers.

The director may obligate and administer any federal grants to municipalities and counties pursuant to the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Assistance Act and the Clean Water Act.

Laws 1988, LB 766, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 40;

Laws 1996, LB 1226, § 23;

Laws 2016, LB737, § 2.